Massachusetts, session 194th, S2180.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 39M of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “The
undersigned certifies under penalties of perjury that this bid is in all respects bona fide, fair and
made without collusion or fraud with any other person” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:-
“The undersigned certifies under penalties of perjury that this bid is in all respects bona
fide, fair and made without collusion with any person and contains no intentional
misrepresentations, omissions or false statements. As used in this paragraph the word “person”
of 3

shall mean any natural person, joint venture, partnership, corporation or any other business or
legal entity.”
SECTION 2. Section 44A of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the definition of “Eligible” the following definition:-
“Fraud”, a statement, act or omission relating to a material fact that (i) has the natural
tendency to be relied upon by or to influence the average person, (ii) is knowingly false or
misleading or is in reckless disregard of its truth or falsity and (iii) is intended to mislead,
regardless of whether the statement, act or omission is actually relied upon
SECTION 3. Said section 44A of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out the definition of “responsible" and inserting in place thereof the
following definition:-
“Responsible” means demonstrably possessing the skill, ability and integrity necessary to
faithfully perform the work called for by a particular contract, based upon a determination of
competent workmanship and financial soundness in accordance with the provisions of section
forty-four D of this chapter and shall certify that his bid contains now misrepresentations,
omissions, or false statements.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of chapter 149A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the definition of “Designer” the following definition:-
“Fraud”, a statement, act or omission relating to a material fact that (i) has the natural
tendency to be relied upon by or to influence the average person, (ii) is knowingly false or
of 3

misleading or is in reckless disregard of its truth or falsity and (iii) is intended to mislead,
regardless of whether the statement, act or omission is actually relied upon.
SECTION 5. Subsection (f) of section 8 of said chapter 149A, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking the fourth sentence and replacing it with the following sentence:-
“The decision of the prequalification committee shall be final and not subject to appeal
except on the grounds that a submission contains intentional, material misrepresentations,
omissions, or false statements, or of collusion.”
SECTION 6. Section 19 of said chapter 149A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out paragraph (6) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
(6) The RFP shall require that every response shall be accompanied by a bid deposit in
the form of a bid bond, or cash, or a certified check on, or a treasurer’s or cashier’s check issued
by a responsible bank or trust company, payable to the awarding authority. The amount of such
bid deposit shall be 5 per cent of the value of the bid. Any person submitting a bid under this
section shall, on such a bid, certify as follows:
The undersigned certifies under penalty of perjury that this bid is in all respects bona fide,
fair, made without collusion with any other person and contains no intentional material
misrepresentations, omissions or false statements. As used in this paragraph the word “person”
shall mean any natural person, joint venture, partnership, corporation or other business or legal
entity.
of 3